Missouri, session 2026, SB1185.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.121, 115.123, 162.083, 162.221,
162.223, 162.241, 162.261, 162.291, 162.301, 162.341, 162.431,
162.459, 162.471, 162.481, 162.492, 162.601, 162.821, 162.825,
162.865, 162.867, and 162.910, RSMo, are repealed and twenty-
three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 67.105, 115.121, 115.123, 162.082, 162.083, 162.221,
162.223, 162.241, 162.261, 162.291, 162.301, 162.341, 162.431,
162.459, 162.471, 162.481, 162.492, 162.601, 162.821, 162.825,
162.865, 162.867, and 162.910, to read as follows:
67.105. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, all proposals submitted to the voters for approval
after August 28, 2026, for the purpose of levying a new tax,
license, or fee, or renewing or increasing the current levy
of an existing tax, license, or fee, shall be submitted by
the governing body of the political subdivision on a general
election day.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1185 2
115.121. 1. The general election day shall be the
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-
numbered years.
2. The primary election day shall be the first Tuesday
after the first Monday in August of even-numbered years.
3. The election day for the election of political
subdivision and special district officers shall be the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in [April] November each
year, and shall be known as the general municipal election
day.
115.123. 1. All public elections shall be held on
Tuesday. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this
section, and section 247.180, all public elections shall be
held on the general election day, the primary election day,
the general municipal election day, the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in November, or on another day expressly
provided by city or county charter, and in nonprimary years
on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August. Bond
elections may be held on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in [February but no other issue shall be included on
the ballot for such election] November of even-numbered
years.
2. The following elections shall be exempt from the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section:
(1) Bond elections necessitated by fire, vandalism or
natural disaster;
(2) Elections for which ownership of real property is
required by law for voting;
(3) Special elections to fill vacancies and to decide
tie votes or election contests; and

SB 1185 3
(4) Tax elections necessitated by a financial hardship
due to a five percent or greater decline in per-pupil state
revenue to a school district from the previous year.
3. Nothing in this section prohibits a charter city or
county from having its primary election in March if the
charter provided for a March primary before August 28, 1999.
4. Nothing in this section shall prohibit elections
held pursuant to section 65.600, but no other issues shall
be on the March ballot except pursuant to this chapter.
162.082. 1. Elections for all school board members
shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
November of even-numbered years, and the term of every
school board member elected in 2027 and every year
thereafter shall be four years, except as specifically
provided in other sections.
2. Any school board member whose term expires prior to
the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of 2027
or in any other odd-numbered year thereafter shall continue
to serve until his or her successor is duly elected and
qualified at the next general election.
3. In an even-numbered year, the number of school
board seats to be elected shall be equal to those with terms
that would have expired in the previous odd-numbered year
and those with terms expiring in such even-numbered year.
Except as specifically provided in other sections, the
candidates in each school board election receiving the
highest number of votes shall be elected for terms of four
years.
4. As used in this chapter, "school board member
election" or "school board election" means the election held
on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November in
even-numbered years starting in 2027.

SB 1185 4
162.083. 1. The state board of education may appoint
additional members to any special administrative board
appointed under section 162.081.
2. The state board of education may set a final term
of office for any member of a special administrative board,
after which a successor member shall be elected by the
voters of the district.
(1) All final terms of office for members of the
special administrative board established under this section
shall expire on June thirtieth.
(2) The election of a successor member shall occur on
the [general municipal election day] first Tuesday after the
first Monday in November of the even-numbered year
immediately prior to the expiration of the final term of
office.
(3) The election shall be conducted in a manner
consistent with the election laws applicable to the school
district.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
barring an otherwise qualified member of the special
administrative board from standing for an elected term on
the board.
4. On a date set by the state board of education, any
district operating under the governance of a special
administrative board shall return to local governance, and
continue operation as a school district as otherwise
authorized by law.
162.221. 1. When the voters of any one or more
districts as authorized in section 162.211, except those
districts designated in subdivision (2) thereof, desire to
form a seven-director district, a petition signed by at
least ten percent in number of those voting for school board

SB 1185 5
members in the last [annual] school election in each
district or one hundred voters, whichever is the higher
number, shall be filed with the state board of education.
On receipt of the petition, a representative of the state
department of education, designated by the commissioner of
education, shall visit the districts and determine the exact
boundaries of the proposed seven-director district. In
determining these boundaries, he shall so locate the
boundary lines as will in his judgment form the best
possible seven-director district, having due regard also to
the welfare of adjoining districts.
2. Within sixty days after the receipt of the
petition, the commissioner of education shall submit the
question to the voters of the proposed district. The notice
shall include a statement of the purpose together with a
plat of the proposed district. The state commissioner shall
file a copy of the petition and of the plat with the county
clerk. The election shall be conducted in the manner
provided in section 162.191.
162.223. 1. When the voters in any two or more
adjacent districts without limitation as to size or
enrollment desire to consolidate and form a new district, a
petition asking for an election upon the question of
consolidation shall be filed with the boards of education of
the affected districts; provided, however, that such
petition shall be signed by ten percent of those in each
district who voted for school directors at the last election
in which such directors were elected, or one hundred voters,
whichever is the higher number.
2. As an alternative to the procedure in subsection 1
of this section, two or more adjacent districts may, by a

SB 1185 6
majority vote of each board of education, call for an
election upon the question of consolidation.
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially
the following form:
Shall the ______ school district and the ______
school district (and the ______ school district)
form a new district with a tax rate ceiling of
______ per one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation? If this proposition is approved, the
adjusted operating levy of the new school
district is estimated to be ______ (amount) per
one hundred dollars of assessed valuation.
4. The board of directors of each affected district
shall cause the question to be included on the ballot to be
submitted to the voters in each such district at the next
election day. A plat of the proposed new district shall be
published and posted with the notices of election.
5. The results of the voting on the proposal in each
district affected shall be certified to the state
commissioner of education by the secretary of each board of
education of each district or by such other person or body
charged with conducting such elections and, should the
majority of the votes cast in each affected district be in
favor of the proposal, the state commissioner shall declare
the new district formed as of July first following the
submission of the question.
6. If the commissioner of education declares, before
the closing date for filing for the election of board
members [on the municipal election date], that the new
district is to be formed as of July first, no candidates
shall be certified by the districts involved in the
consolidation and the board members whose terms would

SB 1185 7
otherwise have expired on that date shall remain as board
members until July first. In consolidation cases where
there is insufficient time from the date the commissioner of
education declares that the new district shall be formed as
of July first and July first to hold an election of board
members, seven board members from the boards of the
consolidating districts shall be drawn by lot to serve until
the next election at which the new board of education can be
elected. The number of board members selected from one
district shall not exceed the quotient resulting from seven
divided by the number of districts consolidating rounded
down to the nearest whole number plus one. The commissioner
of education or a designee shall supervise the drawing, by
lot, of the board members which shall be approved by the
state board of education.
162.241. If a proposal to form a district pursuant to
the provisions of sections 162.171 to 162.191, 162.211 and
162.221, or section 162.223 receives the required majority
of the votes cast on the proposition, the state board of
education or the county commission, in the case of a
district formed pursuant to the provisions of sections
162.171 to 162.191 or 162.211 and 162.221, shall order an
election in the district to be held. This election shall be
for the purpose of electing seven members to serve on the
school board of the district. Such election shall be held
on the [next election day as provided under section 115.123]
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of an even-
numbered year. The election shall be conducted in the
manner provided by section 162.371. A letter from the
commissioner of education, delivered by certified mail to
the presiding commissioner of the county commission of the
county to which the district formed by provisions of section

SB 1185 8
162.223 is assigned shall be the authority for the county
commission to proceed with election procedures in the same
manner as they would be performed by the district board of
education were it in existence; but the costs of the
election shall be paid from the incidental fund of the new
district. [Two] Three directors shall be elected to serve
[until the next municipal election] two-year terms, two to
serve [until the second municipal election] four-year terms,
and two to serve [until the third municipal election. The
seventh board member shall be elected to serve until the
municipal election during which the majority of school
districts elect three board members] six-year terms. Any
director elected after this initial election shall serve a
four-year term.
162.261. 1. The government and control of a seven-
director school district, other than an urban district, is
vested in a board of education of seven members, who hold
their office for [three] four years, except as provided in
sections 162.241 and 162.563, and until their successors are
duly elected and qualified. Any vacancy occurring in the
board shall be filled by the remaining members of the board;
except that if there are more than two vacancies at any one
time, the county commission upon receiving written notice of
the vacancies shall fill the vacancies by appointment. If
there are more than two vacancies at any one time in a
county without a county commission, the county executive
upon receiving written notice of the vacancies shall fill
the vacancies, with the advice and consent of the county
council, by appointment. The person appointed shall hold
office until the next [municipal] election, when a director
shall be elected for the unexpired term.

SB 1185 9
2. No seven-director, urban, or metropolitan school
district board of education shall hire a spouse of any
member of such board for a vacant or newly created position
unless the position has been advertised pursuant to board
policy and the superintendent of schools submits a written
recommendation for the employment of the spouse to the board
of education. The names of all applicants as well as the
name of the applicant hired for the position shall be
included in the board minutes.
3. The provisions of Article VII, Section 6 of the
Missouri Constitution apply to school districts.
162.291. Except as provided in section 162.563, the
voters of each seven-director district other than urban
districts shall, [at municipal elections] on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-numbered
years, elect [two] directors, who are citizens of the United
States and resident taxpayers of the district, [who] in
accordance with the provisions of section 162.082. Such
directors shall have resided in the district for one year
next preceding their election or appointment, and [who are]
be at least twenty-four years of age.
162.301. 1. Within fourteen days after the election
of the first school board in each seven-director district,
other than an urban district, and within fourteen days after
each [annual] election, the board shall meet. The newly
elected members shall qualify by taking the oath of office
prescribed by Article VII, Section 11, of the Constitution
of Missouri.
2. The board shall organize by the election of a
president and vice president, and the board shall, on or
before the fifteenth day of [July of each year] January in
odd-numbered years, elect a secretary and a treasurer, who

SB 1185 10
shall enter upon their respective duties on the fifteenth
day of [July] January. The secretary and treasurer may be
or may not be members of the board. No compensation shall
be granted to either the secretary or the treasurer until
his report and settlement are made and filed or published as
the law directs.
3. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for
the transaction of business, but no contract shall be let,
person employed, bill approved or warrant ordered unless a
majority of the whole board votes therefor.
162.341. The [annual] school board member election in
seven-director districts[, except urban districts,] shall be
held on [municipal election days] the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in November of even-numbered years.
162.431. 1. When it is necessary to change the
boundary lines between seven-director school districts, in
each district affected, ten percent of the voters by number
of those voting for school board members in the last
[annual] school election in each district may petition the
district boards of education in the districts affected,
regardless of county lines, for a change in boundaries. The
question shall be submitted at the next election, as the
term election is referenced and defined in section 115.123.
2. The voters shall decide the question by a majority
vote of those who vote upon the question. If assent to the
change is given by each of the various districts voting,
each voting separately, the boundaries are changed from that
date.
3. If one of the districts votes against the change
and the other votes for the change, the matter may be
appealed to the state board of education, in writing, within
fifteen days of the submission of the question by either one

SB 1185 11
of the districts affected, or in the above event by a
majority of the signers of the petition requesting a vote on
the proposal. At the first meeting of the state board
following the appeal, a board of arbitration composed of
three members, none of whom shall be a resident of any
district affected, shall be appointed. In determining
whether it is necessary to change the boundary line between
seven-director districts, the board of arbitration shall
base its decision upon the following:
(1) The presence of school-aged children in the
affected area;
(2) The presence of actual educational harm to school-
aged children, either due to a significant difference in the
time involved in transporting students or educational
deficiencies in the district which would have its boundary
adversely affected; and
(3) The presence of an educational necessity, not of a
commercial benefit to landowners or to the district
benefitting for the proposed boundary adjustment.
For purposes of subdivision (2) of this subsection,
"significant difference in the time involved in transporting
students" shall mean a difference of forty-five minutes or
more per trip in travel time. "Travel time" is the period
of time required to transport a pupil from the pupil's place
of residence or other designated pick-up point to the site
of the pupil's educational placement.
4. Within twenty days after notification of
appointment, the board of arbitration shall meet and
consider the necessity for the proposed changes and shall
decide whether the boundaries shall be changed as requested
in the petition or be left unchanged, which decision shall

SB 1185 12
be final. The decision by the board of arbitration shall be
rendered not more than thirty days after the matter is
referred to the board. The chairman of the board of
arbitration shall transmit the decision to the secretary of
each district affected who shall enter the same upon the
records of his district and the boundaries shall thereafter
be in accordance with the decision of the board of
arbitration. The members of the board of arbitration shall
be allowed a fee of fifty dollars each, to be paid at the
time the appeal is made by the district taking the appeal or
by the petitioners should they institute the appeal.
5. If the board of arbitration decides that the
boundaries shall be left unchanged, no new petition for the
same, or substantially the same, boundary change between the
same districts shall be filed until after the expiration of
two years from the date of the municipal election at which
the question was submitted to the voters of the districts.
162.459. 1. Notwithstanding other provisions of law
to the contrary, the school board of each school district
designated in the statutes as a seven-director or urban
school district shall consist of seven members. [At the
first election for members of the school board in each of
such districts after January 1, 1993, and each three years
thereafter, three members of the school board shall be
elected; except, no school district composed of seven
members as of January 1, 1993, shall be required to modify
its schedule of electing board members] For all board
members serving terms as of January 1, 2027, their terms
shall be modified in accordance with the provisions of
section 162.082. The term of every board member elected in
2027 or thereafter shall be four years.

SB 1185 13
2. Provisions of law applicable to seven-director and
urban school districts, except those which conflict with the
provisions of this section, shall apply to and govern the
school districts designated in subsection 1 of this section.
162.471. 1. The government and control of an urban
school district is vested in a board of seven directors.
2. Except as provided in section 162.563, each
director shall be a voter of the district who has resided
within this state for one year next preceding the director's
election or appointment and who is at least twenty-four
years of age. All directors elected in 2027 or thereafter,
except as otherwise provided in sections 162.481, 162.492,
and 162.563, shall hold their offices for [six] four years
and until their successors are duly elected and qualified.
The term of any board member serving a six-year term as of
January 1, 2027, shall be modified in accordance with the
provisions of section 162.082. All vacancies occurring in
the board shall be filled by appointment by the board as
soon as practicable, and the person appointed shall hold
office until the next school board election, when a
successor shall be elected for the remainder of the
unexpired term. The power of the board to perform any
official duty during the existence of a vacancy continues
unimpaired thereby.
162.481. 1. Except as otherwise provided in [this
section and] sections 162.492 and 162.563, all elections of
school directors in urban school districts shall be held
biennially [at the same times and places as municipal
elections] on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
November of even-numbered years.
2. Except as otherwise provided in [subsections 3, 4,
and 5] subsection 3 of this section, hereafter when a seven-

SB 1185 14
director district becomes an urban school district, the
directors of the prior seven-director district shall
continue as directors of the urban school district until the
expiration of the terms for which they were elected and
until their successors are elected as provided in this
subsection. The first biennial school election for
directors shall be held in the urban school district at the
time provided in subsection 1 of this section which is on
the date of or subsequent to the expiration of the terms of
the directors of the prior district which are first to
expire, and directors shall be elected to succeed the
directors of the prior district whose terms have expired.
If the terms of two directors only have expired, the
directors elected at the first biennial school election in
the urban school district shall be elected for terms of six
years. If the terms of four directors have expired, two
directors shall be elected for terms of six years and two
shall be elected for terms of four years. At the next
succeeding biennial election held in the urban school
district, successors for the remaining directors of the
prior seven-director district shall be elected. If only two
directors are to be elected they shall be elected for terms
of six years each. If four directors are to be elected, two
shall be elected for terms of six years and two shall be
elected for terms of two years. After seven directors of
the urban school district have been elected under this
subsection, their successors shall be elected for terms of
[six] four years.
3. [In any school district in which a majority of the
district is located in any home rule city with more than one
hundred fifty-five thousand but fewer than two hundred
thousand inhabitants, elections shall be held annually at

SB 1185 15
the same times and places as general municipal elections for
all years where one or more terms expire, and the terms
shall be for three years and until their successors are duly
elected and qualified for all directors elected on and after
August 28, 1998.
4.] For any school district which becomes an urban
school district by reason of the [2000] 2020 federal
decennial census, elections shall be held [annually at the
same times and places as general municipal elections for all
years where one or more terms expire] on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday in November of even-numbered years,
and the terms shall be for [three] four years and until
their successors are duly elected and qualified for all
directors elected on and after [August 28, 2001] November 3,
2027.
[5.] 4. In any school district in any county with a
charter form of government and with more than three hundred
thousand but fewer than four hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants which becomes an urban school district by reason
of the 2010 federal decennial census, elections shall be
held annually at the same times and places as general
municipal elections for all years where one or more terms
expire, and the terms shall be for three years and until
their successors are duly elected and qualified for all
directors elected on and after April 2, 2012.
[6.] 5. In any urban school district in a county of
the first classification with more than eighty-three
thousand but fewer than ninety-two thousand inhabitants and
with a home rule city with more than seventy-six thousand
but fewer than ninety-one thousand inhabitants as the county
seat, elections shall be held annually at the same times and
places as general municipal elections for all years where

SB 1185 16
one or more terms expire, and upon expiration of any term
after August 28, 2015, the term of office shall be for three
years and until their successors are duly elected and
qualified.
162.492. 1. In all urban districts containing the
greater part of the population of a city which has more than
three hundred thousand inhabitants, the election authority
of the city in which the greater portion of the school
district lies, and of the county if the district includes
territory not within the city limits, shall serve ex officio
as a redistricting commission. The commission shall on or
before November 1, 2018, divide the school district into
five subdistricts, all subdistricts being of compact and
contiguous territory and as nearly equal in the number of
inhabitants as practicable and thereafter the board shall
redistrict the district into subdivisions as soon as
practicable after each United States decennial census. In
establishing the subdistricts each member shall have one
vote and a majority vote of the total membership of the
commission is required to make effective any action of the
commission.
2. School board elections for the election of
directors shall be held on municipal election days in 2014
and 2016. At the election in 2014, directors shall be
elected to hold office until 2019 and until their successors
are elected and qualified. At the election in 2016,
directors shall be elected until 2019 and until their
successors are elected and qualified. Beginning in [2019]
2027, school elections for the election of directors shall
be held on the [local election date as specified in the
charter of a home rule city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county]

SB 1185 17
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-
numbered years. The terms of board members described in
this subsection shall be modified in accordance with the
provisions of section 162.082. Beginning at the election
for school directors in [2019] 2027, the number of directors
on the board shall be reduced from nine to seven. Two
directors shall be at-large directors and five directors
shall represent the subdistricts, with one director from
each of the subdistricts. At the [2019] 2027 election, one
of the at-large directors and the directors from
subdistricts one, three, and five shall be elected for a two-
year term, and the other at-large director and the directors
from subdistricts two and four shall be elected for a four-
year term. Thereafter, all seven directors shall serve a
four-year term. Directors shall serve until the next
election and until their successors, then elected, are duly
qualified as provided in this section. In addition to other
qualifications prescribed by law, each member elected from a
subdistrict shall be a resident of the subdistrict from
which he or she is elected. The subdistricts shall be
numbered from one to five.
3. The five candidates, one from each of the
subdistricts, who receive a plurality of the votes cast by
the voters of that subdistrict and the at-large candidates
receiving a plurality of the at-large votes shall be
elected. The name of no candidate for nomination shall be
printed on the ballot unless the candidate has at least
sixty days prior to the election filed a declaration of
candidacy with the secretary of the board of directors
containing the signatures of at least two hundred fifty
registered voters who are residents of the subdistrict
within which the candidate for nomination to a subdistrict

SB 1185 18
office resides, and in case of at-large candidates the
signatures of at least five hundred registered voters. The
election authority shall determine the validity of all
signatures on declarations of candidacy.
4. In any election either for at-large candidates or
candidates elected by the voters of subdistricts, if there
are more than two candidates, a majority of the votes are
not required to elect but the candidate having a plurality
of the votes shall be elected.
5. The names of all candidates shall appear upon the
ballot without party designation and in the order of the
priority of the times of filing their petitions of
nomination. No candidate may file both at large and from a
subdistrict and the names of all candidates shall appear
only once on the ballot, nor may any candidate file more
than one declaration of candidacy. All declarations shall
designate the candidate's residence and whether the
candidate is filing at large or from a subdistrict and the
numerical designation of the subdistrict or at-large area.
6. The provisions of all sections relating to seven-
director school districts shall also apply to and govern
urban districts in cities of more than three hundred
thousand inhabitants, to the extent applicable and not in
conflict with the provisions of those sections specifically
relating to such urban districts.
7. Vacancies which occur on the school board shall be
filled in the manner provided in section 162.471.
162.601. 1. [Elected members of the board in office
on August 28, 1998, shall hold office for the length of term
for which they were elected, and any members appointed
pursuant to section 162.611 to fill vacancies left by
elected members in office on August 28, 1998, shall serve

SB 1185 19
for the remainder of the term to which the replaced member
was elected.
2. No board members shall be elected at the first
municipal election in an odd-numbered year next following
August 28, 1998.
3. Three board members shall be elected at the second
municipal election in an odd-numbered year next following
August 28, 1998, to serve four-year terms.
4. Four board members shall be elected at the third
municipal election in an odd-numbered year next following
August 28, 1998, and two of such members shall be elected to
four-year terms and two of such members shall be elected to
three-year terms. For the two members elected at the
municipal election in 2006, the terms of such members shall
expire after their successors are elected and qualified
pursuant to subsection 6 of this section.
5. Beginning with the fourth municipal election in an
odd-numbered year next following August 28, 1998, and at
each succeeding municipal election in a year during which
board member terms expire, there shall be elected members of
the board of education, who shall assume the duties of their
office at the first regular meeting of the board of
education after their election, and who shall hold office
for four years, and until their successors are elected and
qualified.
6. For the two board members who are elected at the
municipal election in 2006, their successors thereafter
shall be elected at the general election in the year in
which their terms expire] All board members shall be elected
at elections held on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in November of even-numbered years. For all board
members serving terms as of January 1, 2027, their terms

SB 1185 20
shall be modified in accordance with the provisions of
section 162.082. The term of every board member elected in
2027 or thereafter shall be four years.
[7.] 2. Members of the board of directors shall be
elected to represent seven subdistricts. The subdistricts
shall be established by the state board of education to be
compact, contiguous and as nearly equal in population as
practicable. The subdistricts shall be revised by the state
board of education after each decennial census and at any
other time the state board determines that the district's
demographics have changed sufficiently to warrant
redistricting.
[8.] 3. A member shall reside in and be elected in the
subdistrict which the member is elected to represent.
Subdistrict 1 shall be comprised of wards 1, 2, 22 and 27.
Subdistrict 2 shall be comprised of wards 3, 4, 5 and 21.
Subdistrict 3 shall be comprised of wards 18, 19, 20 and
26. Subdistrict 4 shall be comprised of wards 6, 7, 17 and
28. Subdistrict 5 shall be comprised of wards 9, 10, 11 and
12. Subdistrict 6 shall be comprised of wards 13, 14, 16
and 25. Subdistrict 7 shall be comprised of wards 8, 15, 23
and 24.
162.821. The district secretary shall keep a record of
the proceedings of all [annual and special] elections of the
voters of the district and of the proceedings of the board
of education. He shall make copies of the election notices,
contracts with teachers, certificates and all other papers
relating to the business of the district, and securely keep
the same. He shall maintain a correct plat of the district
and shall promptly notify the department of elementary and
secondary education and the county clerk of each county
affected of all changes in the boundaries of the district.

SB 1185 21
He shall transmit to the county commission and to the state
department of elementary and secondary education, on or
before the fifteenth day of August in each year, a report
embracing the following items:
(1) The number of children, male and female, attending
the public schools during the year;
(2) Total number of days' attendance by all such
children;
(3) The number of days the public schools of the
district have been maintained during the school year;
(4) The number of teachers employed, male and female,
and the wages per month of each;
(5) Estimated value of school property owned and
managed by the district;
(6) Assessed valuation of the district;
(7) Rate of school tax on the assessed valuation of
the district;
(8) Cash on hand at the beginning of the year;
(9) Tuition fees received and credited to the
teachers' fund of the district;
(10) Public funds received by county treasurer;
(11) District tax received by county (or township)
treasurer;
(12) Amount paid on teachers' wages;
(13) Amount paid for incidental expenses;
(14) Amount expended for purchasing site, erecting
schoolhouses, rent and repairs;
(15) Amount expended in cancelling bonded indebtedness
and paying interest on same;
(16) Amount expended for library;
(17) Cash on hand at the end of the year; and

SB 1185 22
(18) Such other information as may be required by the
state board of education.
162.825. Whenever there is presented to the state
board of education a petition signed by voters in each
district in the proposed special district equal in number in
each district to five percent of the number of votes cast
for school board members in the last [annual] school
election praying (a) that a special school district
embracing the entire area described in the petition be
organized for the education and training of handicapped and
severely handicapped children and for vocational education
purposes; and (b) that a proposal be submitted to the voters
of the proposed district for the organization of the special
school district, the state board of education, unless
section 162.835 applies, shall, within thirty days of the
receipt of said petition, direct the board of education of
each school district comprising the proposed special
district to cause the proposal to be submitted to the voters
in each such district at the next [municipal] school board
member election or, if the next [annual] school board member
election is more than sixty days away, cause the proposal to
be submitted to the voters in each such district at a
special election called in accordance with law on a date set
by the state board of education. The election shall be
conducted in each school district comprising the proposed
special district in the manner provided by law for the
conducting of school district elections generally in
sections 162.351 and 162.601, unless a different procedure
is specifically provided in sections 162.670 to [162.995]
162.974.
162.865. The board members of a special school
district with a population of not more than one hundred

SB 1185 23
thousand persons shall be elected at large. The seven
receiving the largest number of votes shall be elected and
the three receiving the highest number of votes cast shall
be elected for terms of [three] six years each; the two
receiving the next highest number of votes cast shall be
elected for terms of [two] four years each; and the two
receiving the next highest number of votes cast shall be
elected for terms of [one year] two years each. [That part
of the year between the date of the election of board
members and the municipal election day of the following year
is considered a full year in the terms of the members
elected.] All board members shall serve until their
successors are elected and qualified and the state board of
education shall issue certificates of election to the board
members elected.
162.867. 1. Board of education members of a special
school district with a population of more than one hundred
thousand persons in office on August 28, 1999, shall serve
the remainder of their terms and shall serve until their
successors are duly elected and qualified pursuant to this
section.
2. On and after August 28, 1999, each new member of a
board of education of a special school district with a
population of more than one hundred thousand persons shall
be elected pursuant to this section by the governing council
established pursuant to section 162.856.
3. Pursuant to this section, each qualified candidate
for the board of education of a special school district with
a population of more than one hundred thousand persons
shall:
(1) Be a voter of the district who has resided within
the state for one year next preceding selection to the board

SB 1185 24
and is resident in the subdistrict in which the candidate
files; and
(2) Be at least twenty-four years of age.
4. No member of the board of education of a special
school district with a population of more than one hundred
thousand persons shall:
(1) Vote on, solicit, transact, offer, or accept any
contract between the special school district and any
corporation, partnership, association, or other organization
in which that member of the board of education has a
financial interest, unless otherwise provided herein,
excluding interests owned prior to such member's election;
(2) Hold any office or employment of profit from the
board of education of the special school district while
serving. However, nothing in this section shall be
construed to preclude a person from being elected to or
serving on the board of education of the special school
district on the basis that the person is related to a pupil
of the special school district or to a pupil of any school
district all or a portion of which is contained within the
special school district; or
(3) Vote on, solicit, transact, offer, or accept any
contract or procurement in which that board member shall
have a direct or indirect beneficial interest, unless:
(a) The material facts as to such member's
relationship or interest and as to the contract or
transaction are disclosed in writing and are known to the
board and governing council, and such governing council and
board, in good faith, authorize the contract or transaction
by the affirmative vote of the majority of the disinterested
members; and

SB 1185 25
(b) Such member's relationship or interest in such
contract or transaction shall not be voted upon by such
interested member.
5. [Beginning in April, 1997, and every third year
thereafter, two members shall be elected. Beginning in
April, 1998, and every third year thereafter, two members
shall be elected. Beginning in April, 1999, and every third
year thereafter, three members shall be elected] For all
board members serving terms as of January 1, 2027, their
terms shall be modified in accordance with the provisions of
section 162.082. The term of every board member elected in
2027 or thereafter shall be four years. A member shall be
elected to fill each open seat on the board of education.
6. Board members elected in 2027 or thereafter shall
serve [three-year] four-year terms and shall serve until
their successors are duly elected and qualified.
7. The board of education shall, upon formation and
each decade within ninety days following the publication of
the final decennial census figures thereafter, adopt a
resolution calling for the formation of a redistricting
committee. Upon adoption of such resolution, the secretary
of the board of education shall forward a certified copy
thereof to the state board of education. The redistricting
committee shall consist of three residents within the
district, appointed by the board of education of the special
school district, plus three additional persons resident
within the special school district, appointed by the state
board of education. Thereafter, the redistricting committee
shall meet, organize itself with a chairman and secretary,
and proceed with the adoption of a redistricting plan. Any
plan proposed to be adopted must receive approval of a
majority of the whole redistricting committee. Upon

SB 1185 26
adoption, the redistricting committee shall forward a copy
of the plan certified by the secretary of the redistricting
committee to the state board of education for its approval
or disapproval. The state board of education shall approve
any redistricting plan which divides the special district
into seven subdistricts of equal population, taking into
account insofar as possible existing school district
boundary lines. Upon approval by the state board of
education, the redistricting plan shall become effective and
all board members selected thereafter shall be selected from
subdistricts in which they are resident. If the plan is not
approved, then it shall be returned to the redistricting
committee for revision and resubmission. If a redistricting
plan has not been adopted within one year after the
publication of the decennial census figures, the state board
of education shall provide the redistricting plan. No
member of the redistricting committee shall serve on the
board of education for a period of six years following such
service on the redistricting committee.
100 8. The structure of the board of education and the
101 selection of members of the board of education of a special
102 school district with a population of more than one hundred
103 thousand persons shall be as established pursuant to this
104 section, except as may be otherwise approved by the voters
105 of the special school district under section 162.858.
162.910. At the elections conducted pursuant to
section 162.865, the voters of a special district with a
population of not more than one hundred thousand persons
shall elect, by ballot, two board members to succeed those
whose terms have expired and the board members so elected
shall hold office for terms of [three] four years and until
their successors have been elected and qualified and shall

SB 1185 27
assume the duties of their offices at the first regular
meeting of the board of education held after their
election. Candidates shall file their declarations of
candidacy for office of board member with the secretary of
the board of education of the special school district. A
majority of the then qualified members of the board of
education of the special school district shall certify the
candidates receiving the greatest number of votes for terms
of [three] four years each and until their successors shall
have been elected and qualified, and shall declare and
certify the results of the vote cast on any question
presented at the election.
Section B. Section A of this act shall become
effective on January 1, 2027.
✓